Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-751
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, consideration shall be given to the need to provide uniformity of the law with respect to the subject matter of the act among states that enact it.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 51;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 89.

The general purpose of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, according to an express provision in this section, is to make uniform the law with respect to the model act among states enacting it. Groseth v. Groseth, 257 Neb. 525, 600 N.W.2d 159 (1999).